th: วัสดุโครงไม้สำหรับขึงผ้าใบ: ไม้บัลซา; ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; ไม้เฟอร์; MDF/ไม้เอ็นจิเนียร์; ไม้เพาโลเนีย; ไม้สน; ไม้ป็อปลาร์; ไม้สปรูซ; อื่นๆ
da: Materiale til blindramme: Balsatræ; Bøg; Birk; Ædelgran; MDF/konstrueret træ; Paulownia; Fyrretræ; Poppel; Gran; Andet
tr: Gergi çıtası malzemesi: Balsa ağacı; Kayın; Huş; Göknar; MDF/işlenmiş ahşap; Pavlonya; Çam; Kavak; Ladin; Diğer
nb: Materiale for båre: Balsatre; Bøk; Bjørk; Edelgran; MDF / konstruert treverk; Paulownia; Furu; Poppel; Gran; Annet
it: Materiale delle barre del telaio di tensionamento: Legno di balsa; Faggio; Betulla; Abete; MDF/legno composito; Paulownia; Pino; Pioppo; Abete rosso; Altro
zh-TW: 延展框條材質: 巴沙木; 山毛櫸木; 樺木; 冷杉; MDF/工程木材; 泡桐木; 松木; 白楊木; 雲杉; 其他
cs: Materiál rámu: Balsa; Buk; Bříza; Jedle; MDF / kompozitní dřevo; Paulovnie; Borovice; Topol; Smrk; Jiné
ru: Материал подрамника: Бальсовое дерево; Бук; Береза; Пихта; МДФ/древесные плиты; Павловния; Сосна; Тополь; Ель; Другое
sv: Material för bårstång: Balsaträ; Bok; Björk; Ädelgran; MDF/konstruerat trä; Paulownia; Furu; Poppel; Gran; Övrigt
zh-CN: 内框条材质: 轻木; 山毛榉; 桦木; 冷杉; MDF/人造板; 泡桐; 松木; 杨木; 云杉; 其他
fr: Matériau des barres de châssis: Bois de balsa; Hêtre; Bouleau; Sapin; MDF/bois d’ingénierie; Paulownia; Pin; Peuplier; Épicéa; Autre
vi: Vật liệu thanh căng: Gỗ balsa; Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ bạch dương; Gỗ linh sam; MDF/gỗ công nghiệp; Gỗ hông; Gỗ thông; Gỗ dương; Gỗ vân sam; Khác
ja: ストレッチャーバーの材質: バルサ材; ビーチ; バーチ; ファー; MDF/エンジニアードウッド; 桐; パイン; ポプラ; スプルース; その他
de: Material der Keilrahmenleisten: Balsaholz; Buche; Birke; Tanne; MDF/Holzwerkstoff; Paulownia; Kiefer; Pappel; Fichte; Andere
el: Υλικό τελάρου καμβά: Ξύλο μπάλσα; Οξιά; Σημύδα; Έλατο; MDF/Τεχνητή ξυλεία; Παυλώνια; Πεύκο; Λεύκα; Ερυθρελάτη; Άλλο
ko: 스트레처 바 소재: 발사 나무; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 전나무; MDF/공학 목재; 오동나무; 소나무; 포플러; 가문비나무; 기타
es: Material del bastidor: Madera de balsa; Haya; Abedul; Abeto; MDF/madera de ingeniería; Paulownia; Pino; Álamo; Pícea; Otro
pt-PT: Material das barras do estrado da tela: Madeira de balsa; Faia; Bétula; Abeto; MDF/madeira composta; Paulownia; Pinho; Choupo; Pícea; Outro
pl: Materiał krosna malarskiego: Drewno balsa; Buk; Brzoza; Jodła; MDF / drewno modyfikowane; Paulownia; Sosna; Topola; Świerk; Inne
ro-RO: Material al șasiului: Lemn de balsa; Fag; Mesteacăn; Brad; MDF/lemn compozit; Paulownia; Pin; Plop; Molid; Altele
hr-HR: Materijal za nosiljku: Balza; Bukva; Breza; Jela; MDF / konstruirano drvo; Paulovnija; Bor; Topola; Smreka; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál napínacej lišty: Balsa; Buk; Breza; Jedľa; MDF/lisované drevo; Paulovnia; Borovica; Topoľ; Smrek; Iné
hu: Vakráma anyaga: Balsafa; Bükk; Nyír; Fenyő; MDF/műfa; Császárfa (Paulownia); Fenyő; Nyárfa; Lucfenyő; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material nosilne palice: Balsa; Bukev; Breza; Jelka; MDF/inženirski les; Pavlovnija; Bor; Topol; Smreka; Drugo
lt-LT: Porėmio medžiaga: Balsos mediena; Bukas; Beržas; Kėnis; MDF / dirbtinė mediena; Paulovnija; Pušis; Tuopa; Eglė; Kita
pt-BR: Barra de chassi material: Madeira balsa; Faia; Bétula; Abeto; MDF/Madeira de engenharia; Paulownia; Pinho; Álamo; Pícea; Outro
fi: Kiilapuun materiaali: Balsapuu; Pyökki; Koivu; Pihta; MDF / tekninen puu; Keisaripuu; Mänty; Poppeli; Kuusi; Muu
bg-BG: Материал на подрамката: Балсово дърво; Бук; Бреза; Ела; MDF/инженерна дървесина; Пауловния; Бор; Топола; Смърч; Друго
en: Stretcher bar material: Balsa wood; Beech; Birch; Fir; MDF/engineered wood; Paulownia; Pine; Poplar; Spruce; Other
nl: Spieraamlat materiaal: Balsahout; Beuken; Berken; Zilverspar; MDF/bewerkt hout; Paulownia; Grenen; Populier; Vuren; Overig